Utah statutes.
32A-4-204 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Commission and department duties before
granting licenses.
(1)  Before an airport lounge liquor license may be granted by the commission,
the department shall conduct an investigation and may hold public hearings for
the purpose of gathering information and making recommendations to the
commission as to whether or not a license should be granted.  This information
shall be forwarded to the commission to aid in its determination.
(2)  Before issuing an airport lounge liquor license, the commission shall:
(a)  determine that the applicant has complied with all basic qualifications
and requirements for making application for a license as provided by Sections
32A-4-202 and 32A-4-203, and that the application is complete;
(b)  consider the applicant's ability to manage and operate an airport lounge
liquor license including, but not limited to, management experience, past
retail liquor experience, and the type of management scheme employed by the
airport lounge;
(c)  consider the nature or type of lounge operation of the proposed liquor
licensee; and
(d)  consider any other factors or circumstances it considers necessary.
